Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-4004
First owner, defined.

First owner shall mean any person:

(1) Engaged in the business of selling tobacco products in this state who brings or causes to be brought into this state from outside this state any tobacco products for sale in this state, including a retailer who purchases directly from suppliers outside this state who are not licensed pursuant to subsection (2) of section 77-4009;

(2) Who makes, manufactures, or fabricates tobacco products in this state for sale in this state;

(3) Engaged in business outside this state who ships or transports tobacco products to retailers in this state and who becomes licensed pursuant to subsection (2) of section 77-4009; or

(4) Engaged in business outside this state who makes remote retail sales of covered tobacco products to consumers in this state and who becomes licensed pursuant to subsection (3) of section 77-4009.

Laws 1987, LB 730, § 4;

Laws 2026, LB212, § 4.
January 1, 2027